Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.055

Public employees' benefits board—Members.

(1) The public employees' benefits board is created within the authority. The function of the public employees' benefits board is to design and approve insurance benefit plans for employees and to establish eligibility criteria for participation in insurance benefit plans.

(2) The public employees' benefits board shall be composed of nine members through December 31, 2019, and of eight members thereafter, appointed by the governor as follows:

(a) Two representatives of state employees, one of whom shall represent an employee union certified as exclusive representative of at least one bargaining unit of classified employees, and one of whom is retired, is covered by a program under the jurisdiction of the public employees' benefits board, and represents an organized group of retired public employees;

(b) Through December 31, 2019, two representatives of school district employees, one of whom shall represent an association of school employees as a nonvoting member, and one of whom is retired, and represents an organized group of retired school employees. Thereafter, and only while retired school employees are served by the public employees' benefits board, only the retired representative shall serve on the public employees' benefits board;

(c) Four members with experience in health benefit management and cost containment, one of whom shall be a nonvoting member; and

(d) The director.

(3) The governor shall appoint the initial members of the public employees' benefits board to staggered terms not to exceed four years. Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year terms. Members of the public employees' benefits board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The public employees' benefits board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its business. The director shall serve as chair of the public employees' benefits board. Meetings of the public employees' benefits board shall be at the call of the chair.

[ 2018 c 260 s 11; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 807; 2009 c 537 s 6; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 4; 1994 c 36 s 1; 1993 c 492 s 217; 1989 c 324 s 1; 1988 c 107 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—2009 c 537: See note following RCW 41.05.008.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.

Effective date—1994 c 36: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 21, 1994]." [ 1994 c 36 s 2.]

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.